Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4 Merit System

36-4-1.
Divisions of state service.

The state service shall be divided into a classified service and an unclassified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 7; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-1

.

36-4-2.
Positions in unclassified service.

The classified service shall comprise all positions in the state service, now existing or hereinafter established, except the following specific positions which, with other positions heretofore or hereinafter specifically exempted by legislative act, shall constitute the unclassified service:

Officers and legislators elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in elective offices.

Employees of both houses of the general assembly.

Officers, secretaries, and employees of the office of the governor, office of the lieutenant governor, department of state, department of the attorney general, and the treasury department.

Members of boards and commissions appointed by the governor, members of the state board of elections and the appointees of the board, members of the commission for human rights and the employees of the commission, and directors of departments.

The following specific offices:

In the department of administration: director, chief information officer, cybersecurity officer, director of office of management and budget, director of performance management, deputy director, chief of staff, public information officer and legislative/policy director, and within the health benefits exchange: director, deputy director, administrative assistant, senior policy analyst, and chief strategic planning monitoring and evaluation;

In the department of business regulation: director;

In the department of elementary and secondary education: commissioner of elementary and secondary education;

In the department of higher education: commissioner of postsecondary education;

In the department of health: director, executive director, and deputy director;

In the department of labor and training: director, administrative assistant, administrator of the labor board and legal counsel to the labor board, executive director, and communications director;

In the department of environmental management: director;

In the department of transportation: director, chief operating officer, administrator/division of project management, administrator/division of planning, chief of staff, communications director, legislative director, and policy director;

In the department of human services: director and director of veterans’ affairs;

In the state properties committee: secretary;

In the workers’ compensation court: judges, administrator, deputy administrator, clerk, assistant clerk, clerk secretary;

In the office of healthy aging: director;

In the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals: director;

In the department of corrections: director, assistant director (institutions/operations), assistant director (rehabilitative services), assistant director (administration), and wardens;

In the department of children, youth and families: director, one assistant director, one associate director, one executive director, and a chief of staff;

In the public utilities commission: public utilities administrator;

In the water resources board: general manager;

In the human resources investment council: executive director;

In the office of health and human services: secretary of health and human services;

In the office of commerce: secretary, deputy secretary, chief of staff, communications director, legislative director, and policy director.

Chief of the hoisting engineers, licensing division, and his or her employees; executive director of the veterans memorial building and his or her clerical employees.

One confidential stenographic secretary for each director of a department and each board and commission appointed by the governor.

Special counsel, special prosecutors, regular and special assistants appointed by the attorney general, the public defender and employees of his or her office, and members of the Rhode Island bar occupying a position in the state service as legal counsel to any appointing authority.

The academic and/or commercial teaching staffs of all state institution schools, with the exception of those institutions under the jurisdiction of the council on elementary and secondary education and the council on postsecondary education.

Members of the military or naval forces, when entering or while engaged in the military or naval service.

Judges, referees, receivers, clerks, assistant clerks, and clerical assistants of the supreme, superior, family, and district courts, the traffic tribunal, security officers of the traffic tribunal, jurors, and any persons appointed by any court.

Election officials and employees.

Deputy sheriffs and other employees of the sheriffs division within the department of public safety.

Patient or inmate help in state charitable, penal, and correctional institutions and religious instructors of these institutions and student nurses in training, residents in psychiatry in training, and clinical clerks in temporary training at the institute of mental health within the state of Rhode Island medical center.

Persons employed to make or conduct a temporary and special inquiry, investigation, project, or examination on behalf of the legislature, or a committee therefor, or on behalf of any other agency of the state if the inclusion of these persons in the unclassified service is approved by the personnel administrator. The personnel administrator shall notify the house fiscal advisor and the senate fiscal advisor whenever he or she approves the inclusion of a person in the unclassified service.

The duration of the appointment of a person, other than the persons enumerated in this section, shall not exceed ninety (90) days or until presented to the department of administration. The department of administration may extend the appointment another ninety (90) days. In no event shall the appointment extend beyond one hundred eighty (180) days.

Members of the division of state police within the department of public safety.

Executive secretary of the Blackstone Valley district commission.

Artist and curator of state-owned art objects.

Mental health advocate.

Child advocate.

The position of aquaculture coordinator and marine infrastructure specialist within the coastal resources management council.

Employees of the office of the health insurance commissioner.

In the department of revenue: the director, secretary, attorney.

In the department of public safety: the director.

Provided, however, that, if any position added to the unclassified service by legislative act after January 1, 2015, is occupied by a classified employee on June 30, 2015, such position shall remain in the classified service until such position becomes vacant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, §§ 4, 5; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2958, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; P.L. 1953, ch. 3190, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1953, ch. 3206, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3216, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3435, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3465, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3802, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 1963, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 12; P.L. 1977, ch. 182, § 11; P.L. 1978, ch. 131, § 5; P.L. 1978, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 9; P.L. 1985, ch. 365, § 14; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 29; P.L. 1986, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 82, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 332, art. 1, § 13; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 72, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 206, § 11; P.L. 1991, ch. 342, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 78, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 12, § 14; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 29, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 15; P.L. 1998, ch. 391, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 9; P.L. 1999, ch. 469, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 29, § 9; P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 8; P.L. 2004, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 38, §§ 6, 20; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2008, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 17; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 26; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 8; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 23.

36-4-2.1.
Exemptions from merit system.

The appointment, promotion, salaries, tenure, and dismissal of employees of the legislative and judicial departments shall not be subject to control in any manner or degree by the personnel administrator, or by any other officer or board of the executive branch of government.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 4.

36-4-3.
Branches of classified service.

The classified service shall be divided into a competitive branch and a noncompetitive branch. The competitive branch shall consist of all positions in the classified service except those assigned to the noncompetitive branch as hereinafter provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-3

.

36-4-4.
Positions classed as noncompetitive.

The noncompetitive branch shall include classes of positions that require the performance of routine, laboring, custodial, domestic tasks, or positions that are subject to continuing supervision. In addition to the foregoing, classes of positions that require licenses, certificates, or registrations shall also be included in the noncompetitive branch.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-4

; P.L. 1980, ch. 336, § 1.

36-4-5.
Assignment of positions to noncompetitive branch — Transfer to competitive branch.

No class of positions shall be assigned to the noncompetitive branch unless the assignment has been recommended by the personnel administrator, the director has held a public hearing thereon, has recommended the assignment to the governor, and the governor has approved the assignment. A class of positions may be transferred from the noncompetitive branch to the competitive branch in the same manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-5

.

36-4-6.
Appointments to noncompetitive branch.

Appointments to positions in the noncompetitive branch shall be designated as “noncompetitive appointments”, and shall be made upon recommendation of the appointing authority and approval of the personnel administrator subject to established requirements for character and physical condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-6

; P.L. 1968, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 435, § 1.

36-4-7.
Probationary period in noncompetitive branch — Acquisition of full status.

Persons appointed to positions in the noncompetitive branch shall serve a probationary period of six (6) months during which time the appointing authority shall report to the personnel administrator every sixty (60) days concerning the work of the employee and at the end of the probationary period no further salary or other compensation shall be paid to the employee unless the appointing authority has filed with the personnel administrator a statement, in writing, that the services of the employee have been satisfactory and that it is desired that his or her services be continued. The probationary period is further defined to be one hundred-thirty (130) days worked in the non-competitive position to which the person has been appointed. Upon completion of the probationary period and receipt of the statement of satisfactory service by the personnel administrator and having fulfilled the requirements for character and physical condition, the employee shall be deemed to have acquired full status and shall enjoy all the rights and privileges of that status. Whenever a class of positions shall be assigned to the noncompetitive branch, every employee holding a position in that class at the time of assignment who is a temporary employee and has served in that class for six (6) months or more shall be considered to have completed the required probationary period and upon receipt of a statement from his or her appointing authority that his or her services have been satisfactory shall be deemed to have acquired full status and shall enjoy all the rights and privileges of that status. A temporary employee who has served at least four (4) months but has not completed six (6) months shall be deemed to have served four (4) months of the required probationary period and his or her appointing authority shall submit a report concerning the work of the employee to the personnel administrator and shall at the end of sixty (60) days submit a final probationary report for the employee. An employee who has served at least two (2) months but has not completed four (4) months shall be deemed to have served two (2) months of the required probationary period and his or her appointing authority shall submit a report concerning the work of the employee to the personnel administrator and shall subsequently submit a probationary report at the end of the next sixty (60) days and a final probationary report at the end of six (6) months of service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-7

; P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 1.

36-4-8.
Rules — Amendments.

The personnel administrator shall recommend such rules as he or she may consider necessary, appropriate, or desirable to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 3 of this title and may from time to time recommend amendments thereto. When the rules or amendments are recommended by the personnel administrator, the director shall hold a public hearing thereon, and shall have power to approve or reject the recommendations of the personnel administrator wholly or in part or to modify them and approve them as so modified. The director shall give notice of the hearing at least fourteen (14) calendar days prior to the date of the hearing. Rules or amendments thereto which are approved by the director, shall be submitted to the governor, who shall have power to approve them, with or without modification or to reject them. The rules or amendments thereto shall become effective when approved by the governor. Rules adopted under this section shall have the force and effect of law.

Rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall not change conditions of employment in a unit covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 8; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-8

; P.L. 1989, ch. 284, § 1.

36-4-9.
Adoption of classification plan.

The personnel administrator shall, after consultation with appointing authorities and principal supervising officials, classify all of the positions in the classified service according to the duties and responsibilities of each position. The plan of classification shall designate an appropriate title for each class of position and shall indicate the education, experience, capacity, knowledge, skill, and other qualifications to be required of persons appointed to positions in each class. The complete classification plan shall be so arranged that all positions that are substantially similar with respect to authority, responsibility, and character of work are included within the same class and that the same pay schedules can be made to apply with equity under like working conditions. The class titles so established shall be used in all personnel, accounting, budget, appropriation, and financial records of all state departments, commissions, and institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-9

.

36-4-10.
Changes in plan — Notice of establishment of new positions.

Additional classes may be established and existing classes may be divided, combined, altered, or abolished upon recommendation of the personnel administrator, recommendation by the director after public hearing, and approval by the governor. This action may be initiated either by the personnel administrator, the director, or on request of an appointing authority. Appointing authorities intending to establish new positions shall so notify the personnel administrator, and except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall be appointed to or employed for a new position until it has been properly classified as herein provided and an appropriate list established therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-10

.

36-4-11.
Allocation of positions to classes within plan.

After the adoption of the classification plan by the governor, the personnel administrator shall allocate every position in the classified service to one of the classes established by the plan. Thereafter, whenever new positions are authorized and created, whenever the duties and responsibilities of existing positions change, or whenever the classification plan is amended, the personnel administrator shall allocate or reallocate the affected positions and shall determine the status of employees affected by the action in accordance with the personnel rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-11

.

36-4-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-12

; Repealed by P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 5, effective May 8, 1984.

36-4-13.
Submission of proposed pay plan for classified service.

The personnel administrator shall submit to the director a proposed pay plan showing for each class of position in the classified service minimum and maximum salary rates and such intermediate rates as he or she deems desirable. In arriving at these rates he or she shall take into consideration the advice and suggestions of appointing authorities and other supervising officials, prevailing rates for comparable service in other public employment and in private business, the current cost of living, and the state’s financial policies, conditions, and appropriations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 10; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-13

.

36-4-14.
Adoption of pay plan.

After reasonable opportunity to be heard has been given to employees, appointing authorities, and the general public, and after incorporating any modification, change, or amendment he or she considers desirable, the director shall submit the plan to the governor who shall approve and adopt the plan with such changes as he or she deems necessary and order its application to all positions in the classified service. When the governor has adopted the pay plan, it shall constitute the official pay schedule for positions in the classified service; thereafter, no person in the classified service shall be paid a salary that is greater than the maximum or less than the minimum rates fixed in the approved pay plan or by amendments thereto, or by the personnel rules. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other section of this chapter, upon successful completion of a four-course curriculum incentive in-service training program approved by the personnel administrator, a state employee hired before July 1, 2001 shall be granted a one-step pay increment next above the current base step, or if the employee is at the maximum of the grade the employee shall receive a pay increment equal in amount to the last step in the pay grade, the increment to be retained, separate and apart from any salary or longevity increase that the employee may at that time or thereafter receive.

Upon leaving state service, upon choosing an educational incentive plan provided for in the Personnel Rules or upon choosing to participate in another recognized educational incentive plan, a state employee’s eligibility for the one-step pay increase described in subsection (a) shall cease.

Unless otherwise provided in the general laws, state employees hired on or after July 1, 2001 shall be eligible only for the educational incentive plan as provided for in the Personnel Rules. However, state employees who are eligible for a different statutory or contractual educational incentive plan may choose that other plan instead of the educational incentive plan as provided for in the Personnel Rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 10; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 27, § 1.

36-4-14.1.
Ineligibility for other incentive payments.

Any person receiving an incentive pay increase increment under this chapter is ineligible to benefit from any other educational incentive program such as contained in chapter 28.1 of title 42, §§

42-28.4-1

,

42-56.1-1

, and

8-4.1-1

, or any other chapter relating to an educational incentive pay program. However, state employees who are eligible for a different statutory or contractual educational incentive plan may choose that other plan instead of the educational incentive plan as provided for in the Personnel Rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 208, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 27, § 1.

36-4-15.
Changes in pay plan for classified service — New classes.

Pay rates shall be established for new classes of positions, and amendments to the existing pay plan may be made upon recommendation of the personnel administrator, recommendation of the director, after public hearing, and approval by the governor. This action may be initiated by the director, the personnel administrator, or at the request of an appointing authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 10; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-15

.

36-4-16.
Unclassified pay plan board — Abolishment — Transfer of functions.

Upon the effective date of this section [June 20, 2005], the unclassified pay plan board shall be abolished, and all powers, duties and obligations of the board conferred thereon pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be transferred to and administered by the department of administration. Any reference to the unclassified pay plan board within the general laws shall now be construed to refer to the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-16

; P.L. 1965, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 60, § 2; P.L. 1973, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. XII, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 637, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 76; P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 1.

36-4-16.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. XII, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 174, art. XII, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

36-4-16.2.
Duties and responsibilities of the department of administration.

It is the duty of the department of administration to maintain a pay plan for unclassified employees of the state, including any rules and regulations that are necessary to implement and complement the plan. In maintaining the pay plan, it will be the duty of the department of administration to allocate all new unclassified positions to existing grades within the plan, and to review at least once annually all existing unclassified positions and to reallocate those positions within the pay plan as it deems proper. No new unclassified position shall be created or allocated or reallocated to any grade within the plan unless state agency and department heads have been afforded the opportunity to make recommendations regarding the proposed changes; provided further, however that any unclassified position that has been vacant for more than twelve (12) months shall be canceled and removed from the unclassified pay plan unless within that twelve (12) months the person having supervisory authority over the position requests an extension, in which case the department of administration may approve an extension of not more than twelve (12) months; and provided further, that employees, appointing authorities, and the general public, shall be afforded an opportunity at a public hearing to provide testimony, orally and in writing, regarding the changes, prior to the department’s submission of recommendations to the governor. The agenda for the public hearing shall include a summary of the proposed changes. Hearings conducted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42.

The department of administration, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, shall only have the authority to make recommendations to the governor. The governor shall approve and adopt the plan with such changes as he or she may deem necessary. Following approval by the governor, all unclassified pay plan changes shall be included in the normal budget process in the appropriate section of the personnel supplement.

When the pay plan and regulations have been adopted they shall constitute the official pay schedule for the positions in the unclassified service. Thereafter, no person in the unclassified service shall be paid a salary that is greater than the maximum or less than the minimum rates fixed by the approved pay plan and regulations or by amendments thereto, nor shall salary adjustments for unclassified employees made by the department of administration during its review exceed two (2) grades per year at the maximum of the grade; provided, however, that unclassified employees shall be entitled to all monetary additives accorded other state employees, including, but not limited to, longevity and incentive training awards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. XII, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 1.

36-4-16.3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. XII, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

36-4-16.4.
Salaries of directors.

In the month of March of each year, the department of administration shall conduct a public hearing to determine salaries to be paid to directors of all state executive departments for the following year, at which hearing all persons shall have the opportunity to provide testimony, orally and in writing. In determining these salaries, the department of administration will take into consideration the duties and responsibilities of the aforenamed officers, as well as such related factors as salaries paid executive positions in other states and levels of government, and in comparable positions anywhere that require similar skills, experience, or training. Consideration shall also be given to the amounts of salary adjustments made for other state employees during the period that pay for directors was set last.

Each salary determined by the department of administration will be in a flat amount, exclusive of such other monetary provisions as longevity, educational incentive awards, or other fringe additives accorded other state employees under provisions of law, and for which directors are eligible and entitled.

In no event will the department of administration lower the salaries of existing directors during their term of office.

Upon determination by the department of administration, the proposed salaries of directors will be referred to the general assembly by the last day in April of that year to go into effect thirty (30) days hence, unless rejected by formal action of the house and the senate acting concurrently within that time.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, for 2022 only, the time period for the department of administration to conduct the public hearing shall be extended to September and the proposed salaries shall be referred to the general assembly by October 30. The salaries may take effect before next year, but all other provisions of this section shall apply.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 12.]

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, for 2022 only, the salary of the director of the department of children, youth and families shall be determined by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. XII, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 332, art. 1, § 13; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 3, § 7, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 12, effective June 27, 2022.

36-4-16.5.
Certain unclassified positions excluded.

Sections

36-4-16.2

and

36-4-16.4

of this chapter shall have no application to those positions enumerated in subdivisions 36-4-2(1), 36-4-2(2) and 36-4-2(3), and the department of administration shall have no jurisdiction over the status, tenure or salaries of those said enumerated positions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 51, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 52, § 3.

36-4-17.
Preparation of employment lists.

The personnel administrator shall, as in his or her estimation the need requires, prepare for the several classes of positions in the classified service statewide or regional lists of persons eligible for original appointment to positions in those classes. Each employment list shall include the names of those persons who have shown by competitive tests that they possess the qualifications which entitle them to be considered eligible for appointment to any position in the class or classes for which the list is prepared.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 11; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, § 6; P.L. 1950, ch. 2456, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-17

.

36-4-17.1.
Longevity payments.

A state employee in the classified or unclassified service who terminates employment and is subsequently reemployed by the state, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the general laws to the contrary, shall be eligible to receive an aggregate longevity increase for the period of initial employment. The provisions of this section shall be applied retroactively to those persons reemployed prior to June 1, 1980, and thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 1.

36-4-17.2.
Future longevity payments.

Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for state employees; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011 or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the employee shall continue to receive the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the same longevity percentage in effect on June 30, 2011 or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 8, § 1.

36-4-18.
Competitive tests.

The competitive tests shall be designed to determine fairly the capacity of the persons examined to perform the duties of the positions in the classes for which the lists are prepared. The competitive tests shall be open to applicants who are residents of the state of Rhode Island; provided, that the personnel administrator may admit to competitive tests for technical, professional, or unusual positions residents of other states. Any resident denied admission to an examination on the grounds of insufficient qualifications as established in the class specifications involved may, within five (5) calendar days of the mailing of the notices, appeal in writing to the administrator of adjudication for a hearing or review of the denial. On the basis of the review or hearing, the administrator of adjudication may direct the personnel administrator to permit the appellant to take the examination. The tests may take into consideration elements of character, education, aptitude, experience, knowledge, skill, personality, physical fitness, professional license, or specialized training, and other pertinent matters, and may be written, oral, physical, or in the form of demonstration of skill, or any combination of these types. Public notice of every test shall be given in the manner prescribed by the personnel rules. Persons having a legitimate and proper interest in examination questions used in connection with any examination shall be freely allowed to inspect the questions, when all phases of the examination in which the questions were used have been completed under such conditions as shall be specified in the personnel rules. The final earned rating of each person competing in any test shall be determined by the weighted average of the earned rating on all phases of the test according to weights for each phase established by the personnel administrator in advance of the giving of the tests and published as part of the announcement of the examination. However, the personnel administrator may discontinue the examination process for any competitor when it has been determined that the required minimum final earned rating cannot be attained. All persons competing in any test shall be given written notice of their standing on any employment list or of their failure to attain a place upon the list. The personnel administrator may as deemed appropriate establish broadband examinations for a wide variety of entry and/or other levels of positions which would not be ranked in the traditional manner. The examinations would be ranked only upon certification to an appropriate vacancy and subject to conditions established in the personnel rules and the provisions of §§

36-4-4

and

36-4-7

shall not apply to any appointments which are in the unclassified service. When an appropriate vacancy exists, the appointing authority will certify as to the appropriate knowledge, skills, and abilities required for successful performance in a particular position or positions. The personnel administrator will then proceed to rank all eligibles who have qualified and possess the requisite knowledge, skills, and abilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 11; P.L. 1941, ch. 1050, § 6; P.L. 1950, ch. 2456, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-18

; P.L. 1968, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2.

36-4-19.
Placement of names on employment lists — Listing of veterans.

The names of all persons attaining the minimum final earned rating established by the personnel administrator shall be placed upon the employment list in the order of their ratings; provided, however, that there shall be added to the final earned ratings of examinees who are veterans in competitive tests for entrance into the classified service, but not for promotion in the service, who receive at least the minimum required final earned rating as stated in the public notice, service credits amounting to five (5) points for veterans or service credits amounting to ten (10) points for disabled veterans. On all employment lists, the letter “V” shall be placed opposite the name of each veteran as defined in chapter 3 of this title, who, by reason of his or her final earned rating, is entitled to have his or her name placed on an employment list, and the letters “DV” shall be placed opposite the name of each disabled veteran, as defined in chapter 3 of this title, who, by reason of his or her final earned rating is entitled to have his or her name placed on the list.

For the purposes of this section:

“War veteran” means any veteran of any conflict war, undeclared war or contingency operation who has earned a campaign ribbon or expeditionary medal for his or her service, in these operations, as noted on acceptable military documentation. The war veteran must have been honorably or generally discharged from the armed forces of this nation.

“Veteran” means a person who served on active duty for other than training for a period of more than thirty (30) days and was discharged or released there from with other than a dishonorable discharge; or was discharged or released from active duty because of a service-connected disability; or served as a member of the national guard or reserve forces and served a minimum of twenty (20) years of honorable service in the national guard or reserve forces, has received a certificate of retirement and has been honorably or generally discharged from the national guard or reserve forces.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 11; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-19

; P.L. 1992, ch. 156, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 420, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 485, § 1.

36-4-20.
Duration of employment lists.

Each employment list shall remain in force until exhausted, until replaced, or combined with a more recently prepared list or until two (2) years from the date of its preparation, except that the personnel administrator may extend the duration of any list for a period not to exceed two (2) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 11; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-20

; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2.

36-4-21.
Open continuous competitive tests.

The personnel administrator may use open continuous competitive tests to establish lists and fill vacancies in an agency or agencies where there is a continued shortage of available qualified persons or where there is a manifest imbalance of minorities (as currently defined in employment law as Blacks, Hispanics, American Indians including Alaska Natives, and Asians including Pacific Islanders) in the job category. Open continuous competitive tests shall be subject to the conditions established in this chapter for the preparation of employment lists.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-21

; P.L. 1994, ch. 133, § 7.